Utah statutes.
49-22-201.   System membership -- Eligibility.

(1)  Beginning July 1, 2011, a participating employer shall participate in this system.

(2) (a)  A person entering regular full-time employment with a participating employer on or after July 1, 2011, is eligible:

(i)  as a member for service credit and defined contributions under the Tier II hybrid retirement system established by Part 3, Tier II Hybrid Retirement System; or

(ii)  as a participant for defined contributions under the Tier II defined contribution plan established by Part 4, Tier II Defined Contribution Plan.

(b)  A person entering regular full-time employment with a participating employer on or after July 1, 2011, shall:

(i)  make an election to participate in the system created under this chapter within 30 days from the date of employment:

(A)  as a member for service credit and defined contributions under the Tier II hybrid retirement system established by Part 3, Tier II Hybrid Retirement System; or

(B)  as a participant for defined contributions under the Tier II defined contribution plan established by Part 4, Tier II Defined Contribution Plan; and

(ii)  submit to the office notification of the member's election under Subsection (2)(b)(i) in a manner approved by the office.

(c)  An election made by a person entering regular full-time employment with a participating employer under this Subsection (2) is irrevocable.

(d)  If no election is made under Subsection (2)(b)(i), the person shall become a member eligible for service credit and defined contributions under the Tier II hybrid retirement system established by Part 3, Tier II Hybrid Retirement System.

(3)  Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a governor or legislator initially entering office on or after July 1, 2011:

(a)  is only eligible to participate in the Tier II defined contribution plan established under Chapter 22, Part 4, Tier II Defined Contribution Plan; and

(b)  is not eligible to participate in the Tier II hybrid retirement system established under Chapter 22, Part 3, Tier II Hybrid Retirement System.

